Illinois, session 104th, HB5450.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Section 3.1-55-30 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/3.1-55-30 new)7    Sec. 3.1-55-30. Restrictions on candidates for municipal 8office.9    (a) No municipal official, municipal employee, or 10candidate for a municipal office shall engage in or permit the 11unauthorized use of any municipal property.12    (b) Unless otherwise permitted in this Code, no candidate 13for municipal office or political fundraising committee may 14use any municipal property or photographic or filmed image of 15municipal property for the purpose of influencing, in any way, 16the outcome of any election of any candidate for municipal 17office.18    (c) Whenever a political fundraising committee makes an 19expenditure for a pamphlet, circular, handbill, Internet or 20telephone communication, radio, television, or print 21advertisement, including, but not limited to, newspapers, 22magazines, outdoor advertising facilities, mailings, or 23electronic or Internet-based or social media sites, for the   HB5450- 2 -LRB104 19640 RTM 33089 b1purpose of financing communications expressly advocating for 2the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate for 3municipal office or solicits any contribution through any a 4manner listed in this subsection, the communication, if paid 5for and authorized by a candidate for municipal office or an 6authorized political committee of a candidate for municipal 7office or its agents, shall clearly state that the 8communication was paid for by the authorized political 9fundraising committee and shall contain a statement, either 10read by the candidate in a pre-recorded audio message or 11clearly printed, that the candidate has approved the 12communication.13    (d) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the incidental 14use of municipal property in connection with the solicitation 15and acceptance of any gifts permitted by law.